New Mexico, session 2026, HB271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the office of natural resources trustee for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 through 2029 for land or interests in land for the creation, expansion or restoration of public land, including up to thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) for state matching funds to political subdivisions of the state that have been approved for federal assistance funding due to a natural disaster. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2029 shall revert to the general fund. .233424.2